test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - baga: # 
    baga+V+Inf: baga
    baga+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bagir
    baga+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: bagdi
    baga+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bagdu
    baga+V+Sup: bagt
    baga+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: bagdur

    hvørva+v2+V+Inf: hvørva
    hvørva+v2+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hvørvir
    hvørva+v2+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [hvørvdi, hvørvdu]
    hvørva+v2+V+Sup: hvørvt
    hvørva+v2+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hvørvdur
